spanish-morph/spanish.foma
### spanish.foma ###

# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];

# Vowels
define V2 [ ú | í | ó ];

# Consonants
define C [ b | c | c h | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | l l | m | n | ñ | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ];

read lexc spanish.lexc
define Lexicon;

# YInsertion
define YInsertion [..] -> y || u _ i r "^" [ o | a | e | r a | n d o | r o n | ó ], u _ i r "^" [ s | n ].#.;

#
define EIEReplacement e -> i e || _ C+ [ a r | e r ] "^" [ o.#. | s.#. | n.#. | e a | a e ];

#
define EIEReplacement2 e -> i e || _ [ n t i r | r i r | r t i r] "^" [ o.#. | s.#. | n.#. | e a | a e ],, e -> i || _ [ n t i r | r i r | r t i r] "^" [ n d o | ó.#. | r o n | r a | i s ];

#
define OUEReplacement o -> u e || _ C+ [ a r | e r ] "^" [ o.#. | s.#. | n.#. | e a | a e ];

#
define SIReplacement a r -> é, [ e r | i r ] -> á || _ "^" i s.#.;

#
define Presente a r -> á, e r -> é, i r -> 0 || _ "^" í s.#. .o. í s -> i s || [ á | é ] "^"_ .#.;

#
define PreferitoSimple í -> é, i m o s -> m o s || a r "^" _ .#.;

# ERReplacement
define ERReplacement  e r  -> i r || _ "^" [ s t e | d o | d a | s t e i s | ó ];

# IRReplacement
define IRReplacement  i r  -> e r || _ "^" [ n | s ].#.;

# IEReplacement
define IEReplacement [ e r | i r ]  -> i e || _ "^" [ r o n | r e | r a | s e | n d o] .o. e -> é, a r -> á || _ "^" [ r a m o s | s e m o s | r e m o s];

# Preterito Imperfecto de Indicativo
define PreteritoImperfecto [ e r | i r ] -> í, a r -> a b || _ "^" [ a | a s | a i s | a n ].#. .o. a r -> á b || _ "^" a m o s.#.; 

#
define EAReplacement e a -> e, a e -> a || a r "^" _ ,, e a -> a, a e -> e || [ e r | i r ] "^"_;

# R deletion
define RDeletion r -> 0 || _"^" [ m o s | s | n | d | s t e | r o n | s t e i s | ó | r e | r a | s e | r é ];

# Presente de Indicativo
define VerbDeletion [ a r | e r | i r ] -> 0 || _ "^" [ o | í .#. | a | e | é .#. | a m o s | i m o s ];

# Presente de Indicativo
define Preterito a r -> 0 || _ "^" ó;

# BugFix
define BugFix r r e m o s -> e m o s || "^" _ .#.;

# BugFix
define BugFix2 c i ó n e -> c i o n e || _ "^";

# BugFix
define BugFix3 c i ó n -> c i o n || a _ "^";

# A replacement: -o changes to -a,
define AReplacement o -> 0 || _ "^" a;

# E insertion e added after consonants before s
# examples: papel^s:papeles; pez^s:peces; nariz^s:narices
define EInsertion z -> c || _ "^" s .o. [..] -> e || [[ V | V2 | C ] [ C | V2 ] & ~[[a | e | i ] r]] | .#.C _ "^" s.#.;

# Bad Verbs Group 5
define ZInsertion1 [..] -> z || _ c e r  "^" [ o .#. | a .#. | a s | a m o s | á i s | a n ];
define Zinsertion2 [..] -> z || d u _ c i r  "^" [ o .#. | a .#. | a s | a m o s | á i s | a n ];
define CJReplace c -> j || d u _ i r "^" [ í .#. | i s t e | i ó | i m o s | i s t e i s | i e r o n ];

# YCleanup
define YCleanup i -> 0 || u y _ [ e | é ] "^" [ r a | n d o | r o n ], u y _ "^" ó;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Word [a|á|b|c|d|e|é|f|g|h|i|í|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|o|ó|p|q|r|s|t|u|ú|v|w|x|y|z]+;

read lexc guessspanish.lexc
define GuessLexicon;

read lexc spanish.lexc
define MainLexicon;

define Grammar MainLexicon .o.
        YInsertion      .o.
        EIEReplacement2 .o.
        SIReplacement   .o.
        PreferitoSimple .o.
        ERReplacement   .o.
        IRReplacement   .o.
        IEReplacement   .o.
        PreteritoImperfecto .o.
        Preterito       .o.
        Presente        .o.
        EAReplacement   .o.
        EInsertion      .o.
        ZInsertion1     .o.
        Zinsertion2     .o.
        CJReplace       .o.
        VerbDeletion    .o.
        RDeletion       .o.
        AReplacement    .o.
        BugFix          .o.
        BugFix2         .o.
        BugFix3         .o.
        YCleanup        .o.
        Cleanup;

regex Grammar ;
